Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 20
EXTRADITION OF PERSONS OF UNSOUND MIND

Section

16-20-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Extradition of Persons of Unsound Mind Act".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 639, § 2, effective June 29.

16-20-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 20, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Executive authority" means the executive authority of any state; and, when used in connection with a request to return any person, pursuant to the provisions of this article, to or from the District of Columbia, "executive authority" includes a justice of the supreme court of the District of Columbia and any other authority.

"Flight" or "fled" means any voluntary or involuntary departure from the jurisdiction of the court where proceedings for determination as a person of unsound mind have been instituted and are still pending with the effect of avoiding, impeding, or delaying the action of the court in which such proceedings have been instituted or are pending or any such departure from the state where the person demanded then was, if he was then under detention by law as a person of unsound mind and subject to detention.

"Person of unsound mind" includes the terms "insane person", "mentally ill person", "person with a mental illness", "person with a mental health disorder", and "mentally incompetent person".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 639, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 1397, § 43, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

IP and (3) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1301, § 127, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

16-20-103. Persons subject to extradition.

A person alleged to be of unsound mind found in this state who has fled from another state shall be extradited from this state on demand of the executive authority of the state from which he fled if, at the time of his flight:

He was under detention by law in a hospital, asylum, or other institution for the insane as a person of unsound mind;

He had been determined by a legal proceeding to be of unsound mind prior to his flight, the finding being unreversed and in full force and effect and the control of his person having been acquired by a court of competent jurisdiction of the state from which he fled; or

He was subject to detention in such state, being then his legal domicile (personal process having been made), based on legal proceedings to have him declared of unsound mind.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 639, § 2, effective June 29.

16-20-104. Executive authority - procedure.

When the executive authority of any state demands of the executive authority of this state any fugitive pursuant to this article and produces a copy of commitment, decree, or other process and proceedings certified as authentic by the executive authority of the state from which the person so charged has fled, with an affidavit made before a proper officer showing the person to be such fugitive, it is the duty of the executive authority of this state to cause immediate notice of the apprehension to be given to the executive authority making such demand or to the agent of such executive authority appointed to receive the fugitive and to cause the fugitive to be delivered to such agent when he appears. If no such agent appears within thirty days from the time of the apprehension, the fugitive may be discharged. Any agent so appointed who receives the fugitive into his custody shall transmit him to the state from which he has fled.

All costs and expenses incurred in apprehending, securing, maintaining, and transmitting such fugitive to the state making such demand shall be paid by such state.

The executive authority of this state has the power, on the application of any person interested, to demand the return of any fugitive from this state in accordance with this article.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 639, § 2, effective June 29.

16-20-105. Limitation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 640, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 353, § 2, effective July 1.